Nebraska, session 109, LB41.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 71-502.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-502.03 (1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, every Every
physician, or other person authorized by law to practice obstetrics, who is
attending a pregnant woman in the state for conditions relating to her
pregnancy during the period of gestation or at delivery shall take, or shall
direct an authorized person to take, cause to be taken a sample of the blood of
such woman at the time of the first examination, third trimester examination,
and birth and shall submit such sample to an approved laboratory for a standard
serological test for syphilis. Every other person permitted by law to attend
pregnant women in the state, but not permitted by law to take blood samples,
shall direct cause such a sample of the blood of such pregnant women to be
taken by a physician, duly licensed to practice either medicine and surgery or
obstetrics, or other person authorized by law to take such sample of blood and
have such sample submitted to an approved laboratory for a standard serological
test for syphilis.
(2) Each pregnant woman shall be informed, in clear and understandable
language, by the physician or other person authorized by law to practice
obstetrics, that such test is voluntary and may be declined verbally or in
writing.
(3) The results of all such laboratory tests shall be reported to the
Department of Health and Human Services on standard forms prescribed and
furnished by the department. For the purpose of this section, a standard
serological test shall be a test for syphilis approved by the department and
shall be made at a laboratory approved to make such tests by the department.
Such laboratory tests, as are required by this section, shall be made on
request at the Department of Health and Human Services Laboratory. A fee may be
established by rule and regulation by the department to defray no more than the
actual cost of such tests. Such fee shall be deposited in the state treasury
and credited to the Health and Human Services Cash Fund. In reporting every
birth and stillbirth, physicians and others required to make such reports shall
state on the portion of the certificate entitled For Medical and Health Use
Only whether a blood test for syphilis has been made upon a specimen of blood
taken from the woman who bore the child for which a birth or stillbirth
certificate is filed and the approximate date when the specimen was taken. No
birth certificate shall show the result of such test. If no test was made, the
reason shall be stated. The department shall provide the necessary clerical,
printing, and other expenses in carrying out this section.
(4)(a) Subject to subdivision (4)(b) of this section, every (2) Every
physician or other person authorized by law to practice obstetrics who is
attending a pregnant woman in the state for conditions relating to her
pregnancy during the period of gestation shall administer or cause to be
administered a test of the pregnant woman’s blood for the presence of the human
immunodeficiency virus infection unless the pregnant woman has given written
informed consent that she does not want to be tested.
(b) The pregnant woman shall be informed, in clear and understandable
language, by the physician or other person authorized by law to practice
obstetrics, that such test is voluntary and may be declined verbally or in
writing.
Sec. 2. It is the intent of the Legislature that the cost of a
serological test for syphilis pursuant to section 71-502.03 for an individual
covered under the Medical Assistance Act, when such test was not covered under
the act prior to the effective date of this act, shall be paid from the
Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund pursuant to section 68-996 and federal
funds.
Sec. 3. Original section 71-502.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is repealed.
-1-